Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201819-401
Commission plan; population requirement.

Any city in this state having not less than two thousand inhabitants as determined by the most recent federal decennial census or the most recent revised certified count by the United States Bureau of the Census may adopt the commission form of government and be governed thereunder by proceeding as provided in sections 19-401 to 19-433.

Laws 1911, c. 24, § 1, p. 150;

R.S.1913, § 5288;

Laws 1919, c. 35, § 1, p. 113;

C.S.1922, § 4511;

Laws 1923, c. 141, § 1, p. 344;

C.S.1929, § 19-401;

R.S.1943, § 19-401;

Laws 2017, LB113, § 23.

Laws 1911, Chapter 24 (sections 19-401 to 19-433), is an act complete in itself, and the constitutional provision respecting the manner of amendment and repeal of former statutes has no application. State ex rel. Baughn v. Ure, 91 Neb. 31, 135 N.W. 224 (1912).